Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2053.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 43PENNSYLVANIA CENSUS COMMISSIONSec.4301. Definitions.4302. Pennsylvania Census Commission.4303. Report on census activities.§ 4301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Census Commission established 12345678910111213141516171819 under section 4302 (relating to Pennsylvania Census Commission).§ 4302. Pennsylvania Census Commission.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Census Commission is established within the Joint State Government Commission.(b) Membership.--The commission shall be composed of the following members:(1) The Governor or a designee.(2) The Secretary of Agriculture or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Community and Economic Development or a designee.(4) The Secretary of Corrections or a designee.(5) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.(6) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee.(7) The President pro tempore of the Senate or a designee.(8) The Minority Leader of the Senate or a designee.(9) The Speaker of the House of Representatives or a designee.(10) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives or a designee.(11) Eleven other members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate which shall include members who:(i) Represent a rural community.(ii) Represent an urban community.(iii) Represent a suburban community.(iv) Represent the following regions of this Commonwealth:(A) The northeastern region.(B) The northwestern region.(C) The southcentral region.20250HB2053PN2631 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) The southeastern region.(E) The southwestern region.(c) Duties.--The commission shall have the following duties:(1) Advise the Governor and the General Assembly on census activities within the Commonwealth.(2) Identify barriers that might impede the progress of future Federal decennial censuses in this Commonwealth.(3) Promote and advertise future Federal decennial censuses.(4) Respond to residents' questions and concerns about a census.(5) Develop partnerships with regional and local Complete Count Committees to increase participation in the census.(6) Distribute and share census information with traditionally hard-to-count areas and populations.(7) Seek to ensure the highest census participation rate possible.(8) Gather information and produce reports under section 4303 (relating to report on census activities).(d) Quorum.--A majority of appointed members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business.(e) Chairperson and vice chairperson.--The members shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson from among the membership of the commission.(f) Transparency and ethics.--The commission shall be subject to the following laws:(1) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as 20250HB2053PN2631 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Right-to-Know Law.(3) 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(g) Information gathering.--The commission shall use data from the Pennsylvania State Data Center and may conduct hearings and otherwise gather additional relevant information and analysis that the commission considers appropriate and necessary.(h) Reimbursement.--Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses.§ 4303. Report on census activities.(a) Annual report.--The commission shall gather and issue an annual report on the commission's findings by December 1, 2025, and each December 1 thereafter.(b) Additional reports.--In addition to the commission's annual report, the commission shall gather and issue the following reports:(1) Previous Federal decennial census activities and results by January 1, 2026, and each January 1 thereafter that begins 48 months prior to the start of a future Federal decennial census year.(2) A preliminary plan for a future Federal decennial census by January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter that begins 36 months prior to the start of a future Federal decennial census year.(3) A final plan for a future Federal decennial census by July 1, 2027, and each July 1 thereafter that begins 36 months prior to the start of a future Federal decennial census year.(4) An implementation plan for a future Federal decennial census by January 1, 2028, and each January 1 20250HB2053PN2631 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereafter that begins 24 months prior to the start of a future Federal decennial census year.(5) Funding recommendation plan for a future Federal decennial census by July 1, 2028, and each July 1 thereafter that begins 24 months prior to the start of a future Federal decennial census year.(c) Submission of reports.--The reports under this section shall be reported to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Reports made publicly available.--A copy of all reports under this section shall be made publicly available by being posted on the Joint State Government Commission's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2053PN2631 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021